Idaho, session 2026, S1331.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriations made in the Laws of 2025, as enacted by the First Regular
Session of the Sixty-eighth Idaho Legislature, are hereby reduced according
to the designated programs and expenses classes from the listed funds for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(1) PUBLIC SCHOOL SUPPORT:
I. TEACHERS:
FROM:
Public School Income
Fund $5,663,100 $5,663,100
II. STUDENT SUPPORT:
A. ADMINISTRATORS DIVISION:
FROM:
Public School Income
Fund $1,808,800 $1,808,800
B. OPERATIONS DIVISION:
FROM:
Public School Income
Fund $14,894,600 $14,894,600
PUBLIC SCHOOL
SUPPORTTOTAL $22,366,500 $22,366,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(2) STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION:
I. AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH & EXTENSION SERVICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,562,400 $35,900 $1,598,300
II. COLLEGE AND UNIVERSITIES:
A. BOISE STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $525,000 $4,889,000 $5,414,000
Unrestricted
Fund 1,412,400 0 1,412,400
TOTAL $1,937,400 $4,889,000 $6,826,400
B. IDAHO STATE UNIVERSITY:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,688,600 $527,700 $4,216,300
Charitable Institutions Endowment Income
Fund 49,900 49,900
Normal School Endowment Income
Fund 95,700 95,700
Unrestricted
Fund 893,600 0 893,600
TOTAL $4,727,800 $527,700 $5,255,500
C. LEWIS-CLARK STATE COLLEGE:
FROM:
General
Fund $942,900 $28,300 $971,200
Unrestricted
Fund 224,700 0 224,700
TOTAL $1,167,600 $28,300 $1,195,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
D. UNIVERSITY OF IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,153,100 $346,100 $104,700 $4,603,900
Unrestricted
Fund 652,600 0 0 652,600
TOTAL $4,805,700 $346,100 $104,700 $5,256,500
E. SYSTEMWIDE PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $114,100 $114,100
III. COMMUNITY COLLEGES:
A. COLLEGE OF EASTERN IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $332,800 $332,800
B. COLLEGE OF SOUTHERN IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $369,900 $477,700 $847,600
C. COLLEGE OF WESTERN IDAHO:
FROM:
General
Fund $907,500 $907,500
D. NORTH IDAHO COLLEGE:
FROM:
General
Fund $315,500 $331,800 $647,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
E. CC SYSTEMWIDE:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,200 $1,200
IV. OFFICE OF THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION:
A. OSBE ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $25,200 $773,300 $29,150,000 $29,948,500
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 1,400 1,400
In-Demand Careers
Fund 11,900 11,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 300 300
Federal Grant
Fund 3,300 0 0 3,300
TOTAL $42,100 $773,300 $29,150,000 $29,965,400
B. IT AND DATA MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $30,500 $175,800 $206,300
C. SCHOOL SAFETY AND SECURITY PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,900 $9,000 $11,900
Miscellaneous Revenue/ School Security Assessment
Fund 1,500 0 1,500
TOTAL $4,400 $9,000 $13,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
V. HEALTH EDUCATION PROGRAMS:
A. BOISE INTERNAL MEDICINE:
FROM:
General
Fund $38,700 $38,700
B. EASTERN IDAHO MED RESIDENCIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $97,400 $97,400
C. FAMILY MEDICINE RESIDENCIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $131,600 $146,400 $278,000
D. IDAHO DENTAL EDUCATION PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $83,200 $83,200
Unrestricted
Fund 6,000 6,000
TOTAL $89,200 $89,200
E. PSYCHIATRY EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $25,100 $25,100
F. UNIVERSITY OF UTAH MEDICAL EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $95,100 $95,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
G. WIMU VETERINARY EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $113,200 $113,200
H. WWAMI MEDICAL EDUCATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $211,700 $100,000 $311,700
VI. DIVISION OF CAREER TECHNICAL EDUCATION:
A. CTE ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $117,900 $60,100 $178,000
B. SECONDARY AND GENERAL PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $42,400 $261,000 $303,400
Federal Grant
Fund 8,900 0 8,900
TOTAL $51,300 $261,000 $312,300
C. POSTSECONDARY PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,555,400 $312,000 $600,000 $2,467,400
D. EDUCATOR SERVICES PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $90,900 $82,600 $173,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
E. RELATED PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,000 $25,800 $62,700 $96,500
Federal Grant
Fund 700 0 0 700
TOTAL $8,700 $25,800 $62,700 $97,200
VII. IDAHO PUBLIC TELEVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $19,300 $58,100 $49,400 $126,800
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 700 0 0 700
TOTAL $20,000 $58,100 $49,400 $127,500
VIII. SPECIAL PROGRAMS:
A. FOREST UTILIZATION RESEARCH:
FROM:
General
Fund $17,700 $51,300 $69,000
B. GEOLOGICAL SURVEY:
FROM:
General
Fund $23,500 $32,600 $56,100
C. MUSEUM OF NATURAL HISTORY:
FROM:
General
Fund $17,900 $13,700 $31,600
D. SCHOLARSHIPS AND GRANTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,700 $1,092,400 $1,094,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
US Dept of Education Gearup Scholarship
Fund 800 0 800
TOTAL $2,500 $1,092,400 $1,094,900
E. SMALL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT CENTERS:
FROM:
General
Fund $37,500 $37,500
F. TECHHELP:
FROM:
General
Fund $18,400 $18,400
IX. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $22,500 $98,000 $120,500
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 5,700 5,700
Public Instruction
Fund 3,600 0 3,600
TOTAL $31,800 $98,000 $129,800
B. STUDENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $29,100 $332,400 $361,500
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 3,400 3,400
Driver's Training
Fund 1,100 1,100
Public Instruction
Fund 1,100 1,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 4,900 4,900
Public Schools Other Income
Fund 300 300
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 300 300
Federal Grant
Fund 40,200 0 40,200
TOTAL $80,400 $332,400 $412,800
X. VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION:
A. VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $31,600 $56,700 $105,000 $193,300
Rehabilitation Revenue and Refunds
Fund 700 700
Federal Grant
Fund 163,800 0 0 163,800
TOTAL $196,100 $56,700 $105,000 $357,800
B. COUNCIL FOR THE DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING:
FROM:
General
Fund $24,800 $24,800
XI. CHARTER SCHOOL COMMISSION:
FROM:
General
Fund $600 $7,400 $8,000
Public Charter School Authorizers
Fund 4,200 0 4,200
TOTAL $4,800 $7,400 $12,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(3) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WELFARE:
I. YOUTH SAFETY & PERMANENCY:
A. YOUTH SAFETY & PERMANENCY:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $248,800 $248,800
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,589,800 1,589,800
TOTAL $1,838,600 $1,838,600
B. FOSTER & ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,125,900 $2,125,900
II. EARLY LEARNING & DEVELOPMENT:
A. EARLY LEARNING AND DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $157,200 $157,200
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 216,500 216,500
TOTAL $373,700 $373,700
B. SOUTHWEST IDAHO TREATMENT CENTER:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $30,300 $30,300
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 2,050,000 2,050,000
TOTAL $2,080,300 $2,080,300
III. FAMILY AND COMMUNITY PARTNERSHIPS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $126,800 $126,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
IV. DIVISION OF WELFARE:
A. SELF-RELIANCE OPERATIONS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $1,826,200 $1,826,200
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 739,700 739,700
TOTAL $2,565,900 $2,565,900
B. BENEFIT PAYMENTS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $809,700 $809,700
V. DIVISION OF MEDICAID:
A. MEDICAID ADMINISTRATION AND MEDICAL MGMT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $161,700 $161,700
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 140,200 140,200
TOTAL $301,900 $301,900
B. COORDINATED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $4,443,000 $4,443,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 8,508,300 8,508,300
TOTAL $12,951,300 $12,951,300
C. ENHANCED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $6,285,900 $6,285,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 12,037,300 12,037,300
TOTAL $18,323,200 $18,323,200
D. BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $4,907,600 $4,907,600
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 9,397,900 9,397,900
TOTAL $14,305,500 $14,305,500
E. EXPANSION MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $1,579,500 $1,579,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 14,267,300 14,267,300
TOTAL $15,846,800 $15,846,800
F. EXTENDED EMPLOYMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $1,900 $87,600 $104,300 $193,800
VI. PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES:
A. PHYSICAL HEALTH SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $327,200 $76,300 $25,200 $428,700
B. LABORATORY SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $93,100 $93,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
C. SUICIDE PREVENTION AND AWARENESS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $54,500 $54,500
D. HEALTH CARE POLICY INITIATIVES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $9,100 $9,100
VII. INDIRECT SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $954,800 $22,600 $977,400
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 168,700 0 168,700
TOTAL $1,123,500 $22,600 $1,146,100
VIII. LICENSING AND CERTIFICATION:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $97,600 $97,600
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 196,900 196,900
TOTAL $294,500 $294,500
IX. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES:
A. CHILDREN'S MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $372,900 $372,900
B. ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $1,182,900 $1,182,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 218,100 218,100
TOTAL $1,401,000 $1,401,000
X. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. STATE HOSPITAL NORTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $36,100 $36,100
B. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $216,300 $216,300
C. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $9,400 $9,400
XI. INDEPENDENT COUNCILS:
A. DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $9,300 $9,300
B. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE COUNCIL:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $7,500 $3,000 $33,500 $44,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 85,200 0 0 85,200
TOTAL $92,700 $3,000 $33,500 $129,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(4) STATE INDEPENDENT LIVING COUNCIL:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,900 $9,900 $11,800
(5) DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION:
I. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $329,000 $329,000
Inmate Labor
Fund 5,700 5,700
Parolee Supervision
Fund 2,900 2,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 9,000 9,000
TOTAL $346,600 $346,600
II. STATE PRISONS:
A. PRISONS ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $46,600 $46,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 300 300
Federal Grant
Fund 61,000 61,000
TOTAL $107,900 $107,900
B. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $249,300 $249,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 9,800 9,800
TOTAL $259,100 $259,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
C. IDAHO STATE CORRECTIONAL CENTER - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $401,000 $401,000
D. IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - OROFINO:
FROM:
General
Fund $282,700 $282,700
Inmate Labor
Fund 29,500 29,500
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 700 700
TOTAL $312,900 $312,900
E. IDAHO MAXIMUM SECURITY INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $192,200 $192,200
F. NORTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - COTTONWOOD:
FROM:
General
Fund $65,300 $65,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 700 700
TOTAL $66,000 $66,000
G. SOUTH IDAHO CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION - BOISE:
FROM:
General
Fund $89,900 $89,900
Inmate Labor
Fund 92,000 92,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 2,100 2,100
TOTAL $184,000 $184,000
H. ST. ANTHONY WORK CAMP:
FROM:
General
Fund $47,300 $47,300
Inmate Labor
Fund 28,000 28,000
TOTAL $75,300 $75,300
I. POCATELLO WOMEN'S CORRECTIONAL CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $67,900 $67,900
Inmate Labor
Fund 3,400 3,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 7,600 7,600
TOTAL $78,900 $78,900
J. SOUTH BOISE WOMEN'S CORRECTIONAL CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $122,000 $122,000
K. MOUNTAIN VIEW TRANSFORMATION CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $135,900 $135,900
III. COUNTY & OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,091,500 $1,091,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
IV. COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS:
A. COMMUNITY SUPERVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $323,800 $323,800
Parolee Supervision
Fund 45,100 45,100
Drug and Mental Health Court Supervision
Fund 2,000 2,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,400 1,400
Federal Grant
Fund 100 100
TOTAL $372,400 $372,400
B. COMMUNITY REENTRY CENTERS:
FROM:
General
Fund $54,000 $54,000
State-Directed Opioid Settlement
Fund 4,300 4,300
Inmate Labor
Fund 86,500 86,500
TOTAL $144,800 $144,800
V. COMMUNITY-BASED SUDS TREATMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $12,300 $12,300
VI. MEDICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,994,800 $1,994,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(6) JUDICIAL BRANCH:
I. SUPREME COURT:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,693,100 $1,693,100
II. DISTRICT COURTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $948,300 $948,300
III. MAGISTRATE DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $105,200 $105,200
IV. COMMUNITY-BASED SUBSTANCE USE TREATMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $365,800 $365,800
(7) DEPARTMENT OF JUVENILE CORRECTIONS:
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $97,500 $45,000 $142,500
II. COMMUNITY, OPERATIONS, AND PROGRAM SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $150,000 $57,000 $855,200 $1,062,200
III. INSTITUTIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $595,500 $270,500 $866,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(8) IDAHO STATE POLICE:
I. BRAND INSPECTION:
FROM:
State Brand Board
Fund $73,100 $73,100
II. DIVISION OF IDAHO STATE POLICE:
A. DIRECTOR'S OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $73,700 $73,700
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 2,200 2,200
Federal Grant
Fund 4,100 4,100
TOTAL $80,000 $80,000
B. CAPITOL PROTECTIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $400 $600 $1,000
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 8,400 8,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 100 0 100
TOTAL $8,900 $600 $9,500
C. INVESTIGATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $103,300 $180,000 $283,300
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 35,900 35,900
Federal Grant
Fund 1,400 0 1,400
TOTAL $140,600 $180,000 $320,600


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
D. PATROL:
FROM:
General
Fund $92,600 $828,500 $921,100
Idaho Law Enforcement
Fund 500 500
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 102,000 102,000
Hazardous Materials/Waste Enforcement
Fund 600 600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 900 900
Federal Grant
Fund 7,900 0 7,900
TOTAL $204,500 $828,500 $1,033,000
E. LAW ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS:
FROM:
General
Fund $800 $800
Alcohol Beverage Control
Fund 1,200 1,200
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 6,100 6,100
TOTAL $8,100 $8,100
F. SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $71,700 $450,000 $521,700
Alcohol Beverage Control
Fund 4,100 4,100
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 900 900
Idaho Law Enforcement Telecommunications
Fund 6,300 6,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 25,800 0 25,800
TOTAL $108,800 $450,000 $558,800
G. FORENSIC SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $25,700 $52,300 $111,900 $189,900
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 16,700 16,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 4,300 4,300
Federal Grant
Fund 6,200 0 0 6,200
TOTAL $52,900 $52,300 $111,900 $217,100
III. POST ACADEMY:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund $1,400 $1,400
Peace Officers Training
Fund 30,700 30,700
Misdemeanor Probation Training
Fund 400 400
TOTAL $32,500 $32,500
IV. RACING COMMISSION:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $67,900 $67,900
(9) DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY:
I. ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $226,200 $22,700 $248,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Air Quality Permitting
Fund 1,100 1,100
Public Water System Supervision
Fund 4,000 4,000
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 107,100 0 107,100
TOTAL $338,400 $22,700 $361,100
II. AIR QUALITY:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $116,000 $116,000
Air Quality Permitting
Fund 29,300 29,300
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 10,700 10,700
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 31,900 31,900
TOTAL $187,900 $187,900
III. WATER QUALITY:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $253,000 $450,300 $703,300
Public Water System Supervision
Fund 5,600 5,600
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 12,200 12,200
IPDES Program
Fund 5,900 5,900
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 36,500 36,500
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 9,900 0 9,900
TOTAL $323,100 $450,300 $773,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
IV. COEUR D'ALENE BASIN COMMISSION:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $300 $300
Environmental Remediation (Basin)
Fund 200 200
TOTAL $500 $500
V. WASTE MANAGEMENT AND REMEDIATION:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $105,900 $105,900
Environmental Remediation (Box)
Fund 5,900 5,900
Environmental Remediation (Basin)
Fund 900 900
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 15,200 15,200
Idaho Underground Storage Tank Program
Fund 4,100 4,100
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 42,200 42,200
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 2,600 2,600
TOTAL $176,800 $176,800
VI. IDAHO NATIONAL LABORATORY OVERSIGHT:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund $5,100 $5,100
(10) DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME:
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $45,500 $45,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 10,300 10,300
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 34,100 34,100
TOTAL $89,900 $89,900
II. ENFORCEMENT:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $95,600 $95,600
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 900 900
TOTAL $96,500 $96,500
III. FISHERIES:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $35,100 $35,100
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 23,300 23,300
Fish and Game Set-Aside
Fund 1,400 1,400
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 98,400 98,400
TOTAL $158,200 $158,200
IV. WILDLIFE:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $61,100 $61,100
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 1,800 1,800
Fish and Game Set-Aside
Fund 1,700 1,700
Fish and Game Set-Aside (Other)
Fund 2,400 2,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 600 600
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 56,400 56,400
TOTAL $124,000 $124,000
V. COMMUNICATIONS:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $15,000 $15,000
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 13,400 13,400
TOTAL $28,400 $28,400
(11) BOARD OF LAND COMMISSIONERS:
I. ENDOWMENT FUND INVESTMENT BOARD:
FROM:
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund $800 $800
II. DEPARTMENT OF LANDS:
A. BUSINESS SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,700 $3,700
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 5,300 5,300
Department of Lands
Fund 6,200 6,200
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 22,700 22,700
TOTAL $37,900 $37,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. FOREST RESOURCES MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,900 $8,900
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 2,700 2,700
Department of Lands
Fund 24,600 24,600
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 1,700 1,700
Federal Grant
Fund 1,500 1,500
TOTAL $39,400 $39,400
C. TRUST LAND MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $800 $800
Department of Lands
Fund 400 400
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 200,900 200,900
TOTAL $202,100 $202,100
D. FOREST AND RANGE FIRE PROTECTION:
FROM:
General
Fund $225,400 $169,500 $65,000 $459,900
Department of Lands
Fund 29,200 29,200
Federal Grant
Fund 100 0 0 100
TOTAL $254,700 $169,500 $65,000 $489,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
E. SCALING PRACTICES:
FROM:
Department of Lands
Fund $4,900 $4,900
F. MINERALS, PUBLIC TRUST, OIL AND GAS:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,100 $8,100
Department of Lands
Fund 7,500 7,500
Oil and Gas Conservation
Fund 1,500 1,500
Navigable Waterways
Fund 2,900 2,900
TOTAL $20,000 $20,000
(12) DEPARTMENT OF PARKS AND RECREATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $30,800 $139,400 $170,200
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 1,300 1,300
Parks and Recreation
Fund 83,500 83,500
Recreational Fuels
Fund 5,000 5,000
Parks and Recreation Registration
Fund 6,100 6,100
Public Recreation Enterprise
Fund 2,900 2,900
Parks and Recreation Expendable Trust
Fund 14,200 14,200
Federal Grant
Fund 21,300 0 21,300
TOTAL $165,100 $139,400 $304,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(13) DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES:
I. MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $28,400 $26,900 $121,500 $176,800
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 2,300 0 0 2,300
TOTAL $30,700 $26,900 $121,500 $179,100
II. PLANNING AND TECHNICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $123,200 $23,000 $28,100 $174,300
Aquifer Planning and Management
Fund 15,600 15,600
Federal Grant
Fund 7,200 0 0 7,200
TOTAL $146,000 $23,000 $28,100 $197,100
III. WATER MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $227,600 $132,100 $8,500 $368,200
Water Administration
Fund 29,100 29,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 3,400 3,400
Federal Grant
Fund 7,700 0 0 7,700
TOTAL $267,800 $132,100 $8,500 $408,400
IV. NORTHERN IDAHO ADJUDICATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $11,900 $5,700 $17,600


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
V. BEAR RIVER BASIN ADJUDICATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $21,800 $4,600 $26,400
(14) DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE:
I. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,700 $15,000 $17,700
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 10,000 10,000
Facilities Maintenance
Fund 4,600 0 4,600
TOTAL $17,300 $15,000 $32,300
B. ANIMAL INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,600 $4,600
Agricultural Fees - Livestock Disease Control
Fund 9,300 9,300
Agricultural Fees - Dairy Inspection
Fund 37,900 37,900
Agricultural Fees - Egg Inspection
Fund 72,300 72,300
Federal Grant
Fund 7,400 7,400
TOTAL $131,500 $131,500
C. AGRICULTURAL RESOURCES:
FROM:
General
Fund $150,800 $127,200 $278,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Agricultural Fees - Pesticides
Fund 38,900 38,900
Federal Grant
Fund 600 0 600
TOTAL $190,300 $127,200 $317,500
D. PLANT INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $184,300 $5,000 $93,800 $283,100
Agricultural Inspection
Fund 18,900 18,900
Invasive Species
Fund 18,000 18,000
Agricultural Fees - Commercial Feed and Fertilizer
Fund 12,300 12,300
Agricultural Fees - Hemp
Fund 1,700 1,700
Quality Assurance Laboratory Services
Fund 4,800 4,800
Federal Grant
Fund 8,800 0 0 8,800
TOTAL $248,800 $5,000 $93,800 $347,600
E. AGRICULTURAL INSPECTIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $24,200 $24,200
Weights and Measures Inspection
Fund 12,300 12,300
Agricultural Fees - Organic Food Products
Fund 7,100 7,100
AgriculturalFees- FreshFruitandVegetableInspection
Fund 7,700 7,700
TOTAL $51,300 $51,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
F. MARKET DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,600 $5,000 $8,600
Agricultural Inspection
Fund 1,000 1,000
Federal Grant
Fund 2,800 0 2,800
TOTAL $7,400 $5,000 $12,400
G. ANIMAL DAMAGE CONTROL:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,100 $3,100
H. SHEEP AND GOAT HEALTH BOARD:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,100 $5,100
II. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION COMMISSION:
FROM:
General
Fund $99,700 $7,700 $200 $42,600 $150,200
Resource Conservation and Rangeland Development
Fund 1,300 0 0 0 1,300
TOTAL $101,000 $7,700 $200 $42,600 $151,500
(15) DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE:
I. COMMERCE:
FROM:
General
Fund $421,600 $60,700 $482,300
Tourism and Promotion
Fund 12,200 12,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 1,800 0 1,800
TOTAL $435,600 $60,700 $496,300
II. BROADBAND OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,300 $1,300
ARPA Capital Projects
Fund 124,200 124,200
Federal Grant
Fund 124,200 124,200
TOTAL $249,700 $249,700
(16) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $52,600 $52,600
(17) INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION:
I. COMPENSATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $68,300 $68,300
II. REHABILITATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $41,500 $41,500
III. CRIME VICTIMS COMPENSATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $11,700 $11,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Crime Victims Compensation
Fund $12,000 0 12,000
TOTAL $12,000 $11,700 $23,700
(18) DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE:
I. INSURANCE REGULATION:
FROM:
Insurance Administrative
Fund $60,900 $60,900
Federal Grant
Fund 4,600 4,600
TOTAL $65,500 $65,500
II. STATE FIRE MARSHAL:
FROM:
Arson, Fire and Fraud Prevention
Fund $10,400 $10,400
(19) DEPARTMENT OF LABOR:
I. ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $600 $4,800 $5,400
Unemployment Penalty and Interest
Fund 27,200 27,200
Employment Security Special Administration
Fund 5,100 5,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 10,200 10,200
Federal Grant
Fund 93,800 0 93,800
TOTAL $136,900 $4,800 $141,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. DETERMINATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,900 $12,200 $20,100
Unemployment Penalty and Interest
Fund 106,700 106,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 10,200 10,200
Federal Grant
Fund 574,700 0 574,700
TOTAL $699,500 $12,200 $711,700
III. WORKFORCE AND COMMISSIONS:
FROM:
Unemployment Penalty and Interest
Fund $15,800 $15,800
Employment Security Special Administration
Fund 90,400 90,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 2,900 2,900
Federal Grant
Fund 159,600 159,600
TOTAL $268,700 $268,700
(20) PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION:
FROM:
Public Utilities Commission
Fund $97,300 $97,300
(21) SELF-GOVERNING AGENCIES:
I. COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS:
FROM:
General
Fund $5,500 $6,000 $11,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. IDAHO STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY:
FROM:
General
Fund $28,000 $169,300 $197,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 5,800 5,800
Records Management Service
Fund 2,400 2,400
Capitol Commission Operating
Fund 700 700
Federal Grant
Fund 70,000 0 70,000
TOTAL $106,900 $169,300 $276,200
III. IDAHO COMMISSION FOR LIBRARIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $60,400 $138,400 $198,800
IV. STATE LOTTERY:
FROM:
State Lottery
Fund $30,600 $30,600
V. STATE APPELLATE PUBLIC DEFENDER:
A. OFFICE OF THE STATE APPELLATE PUBLIC DEFENDER:
FROM:
General
Fund $12,100 $23,700 $35,800
B. CAPITAL AND CONFLICT REPRESENTATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $138,200 $138,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
VI. DIVISION OF VETERANS SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $26,600 $35,700 $10,000 $72,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 394,300 394,300
Veterans Home Endowment Income
Fund 1,500 1,500
Federal Grant
Fund 129,200 0 0 129,200
TOTAL $551,600 $35,700 $10,000 $597,300
VII. OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER:
FROM:
General
Fund $468,200 $1,321,600 $1,789,800
Public Defense
Fund 382,100 0 382,100
TOTAL $850,300 $1,321,600 $2,171,900
VIII.DIVISIONOFOCCUPATIONALANDPROFESSIONALLICENSES:
A. BUILDING CONSTRUCTION & REAL ESTATE:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $152,700 $152,700
Miscellaneous Revenue/ Industrial Safety
Fund 4,300 4,300
Miscellaneous Revenue/ Logging
Fund 700 700
Federal Grant
Fund 2,000 2,000
TOTAL $159,700 $159,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $18,800 $18,800
C. HEALTH PROFESSIONS:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $59,000 $59,000
IX. OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,100 $62,000 $65,100
X. OFFICE OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES OMBUDSMAN:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,400 $15,300 $18,700
XI. COMMISSION OF PARDONS & PAROLE:
FROM:
General
Fund $104,100 $69,600 $173,700
(22) IDAHO TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT:
I. TRANSPORTATION SERVICES:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $107,100 $107,100
B. AERONAUTICS:
FROM:
State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund $14,600 $14,600


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
State Aeronautics (Federal)
Fund 200 200
TOTAL $14,800 $14,800
II. MOTOR VEHICLES:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $240,300 $240,300
III. HIGHWAY OPERATIONS:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $783,900 $783,900
State Highway (Local)
Fund 4,900 4,900
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 265,200 265,200
TOTAL $1,054,000 $1,054,000
(23) DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION:
I. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $200 $10,000 $10,200
Permanent Building
Fund 500 500
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 3,000 3,000
Federal Surplus Property Revolving
Fund 100 100
Employee Group Insurance
Fund 400 400
Retained Risk
Fund 200 200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Industrial Special Indemnity
Fund 100 0 100
TOTAL $4,500 $10,000 $14,500
II. PUBLIC WORKS:
FROM:
General
Fund $55,000 $55,000
Permanent Building
Fund $37,900 37,900
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 43,900 0 43,900
TOTAL $81,800 $55,000 $136,800
III. PURCHASING:
FROM:
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $19,600 $19,600
Federal Surplus Property Revolving
Fund 700 700
TOTAL $20,300 $20,300
IV. INSURANCE MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Employee Group Insurance
Fund $9,100 $9,100
Retained Risk
Fund 3,900 3,900
Industrial Special Indemnity
Fund 700 700
TOTAL $13,700 $13,700
V. DOCUMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $54,000 $54,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 6,900 6,900
TOTAL $60,900 $60,900
(24) ATTORNEY GENERAL:
I. STATE LEGAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,215,100 $1,215,100
Consumer Protection
Fund 3,900 3,900
TOTAL $1,219,000 $1,219,000
II. INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN:
FROM:
General
Fund $91,500 $91,500
(25) STATE CONTROLLER:
I. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,400 $133,200 $136,600
II. STATEWIDE ACCOUNTING:
FROM:
General
Fund $91,500 $91,500
III. COMPUTER CENTER:
FROM:
Data Processing Services
Fund $28,500 $28,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
IV. ENTERPRISE BUSINESS OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $39,300 $705,500 $744,800
(26) OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR:
I. COMMISSION ON AGING:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,500 $191,400 $194,900
Federal Grant
Fund 3,600 0 3,600
TOTAL $7,100 $191,400 $198,500
II. COMMISSION ON THE ARTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $16,300 $11,300 $11,200 $38,800
Federal Grant
Fund 10,300 0 0 10,300
TOTAL $26,600 $11,300 $11,200 $49,100
III. COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED:
FROM:
General
Fund $45,400 $27,000 $72,400
Adaptive Aids and Appliances
Fund 100 100
Federal Grant
Fund 14,600 0 14,600
TOTAL $60,100 $27,000 $87,100
IV. OFFICE OF DRUG POLICY:
FROM:
General
Fund $15,900 $15,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 1,200 1,200
TOTAL $17,100 $17,100
V. OFFICE OF ENERGY AND MINERAL RESOURCES:
FROM:
Petroleum Price Violation
Fund $6,600 $6,600
Federal Grant
Fund 5,900 5,900
TOTAL $12,500 $12,500
VI. DIVISION OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $55,400 $37,800 $93,200
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 1,000 1,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 3,300 3,300
Administrative Code
Fund 1,000 0 1,000
TOTAL $60,700 $37,800 $98,500
VII. EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR:
FROM:
General
Fund $82,800 $35,000 $117,800
VIII. DIVISION OF HUMAN RESOURCES:
FROM:
Division of Human Resources
Fund $159,000 $159,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
IX. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES, OFFICE OF:
FROM:
General
Fund $9,400 $147,900 $157,300
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 91,300 0 91,300
TOTAL $100,700 $147,900 $248,600
X. STATE LIQUOR DIVISION:
FROM:
Liquor Control
Fund $456,500 $456,500
XI. MILITARY DIVISION:
A. MILITARY MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $281,300 $281,300
B. FEDERAL/STATE AGREEMENTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $50,000 $50,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $18,900 18,900
Federal Grant
Fund 240,000 0 240,000
TOTAL $258,900 $50,000 $308,900
C. OFFICE OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $50,000 $50,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
XII. PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT SYSTEM:
A. RETIREMENT ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
PERSI Administrative
Fund $78,700 $78,700
Judges' Retirement
Fund 700 700
TOTAL $79,400 $79,400
B. PORTFOLIO INVESTMENT:
FROM:
PERSI Special
Fund $4,000 $4,000
XIII. OFFICE OF SPECIES CONSERVATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,000 $70,000 $73,000
Federal Grant
Fund 400 0 400
TOTAL $3,400 $70,000 $73,400
XIV. STEM ACTION CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $178,800 $68,800 $247,600
XV. WOLF DEPREDATION CONTROL BOARD:
FROM:
General
Fund $15,700 $15,700
XVI. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL:
FROM:
Workforce Development Training
Fund $4,300 $4,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
In-Demand Careers
Fund 6,900 6,900
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 300 300
Federal Grant
Fund 1,500 1,500
TOTAL $13,000 $13,000
(27) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH:
I. LEGISLATIVE SERVICES OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $132,800 $237,700 $370,500
II. OFFICE OF PERFORMANCE EVALUATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $42,900 $2,300 $45,200
(28) LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR:
FROM:
General
Fund $12,800 $12,800
(29) DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE AND TAXATION:
I. BOARD OF TAX APPEALS:
FROM:
General
Fund $27,200 $27,200
II. STATE TAX COMMISSION:
A. GENERAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $77,600 $1,004,800 $1,082,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 1,600 1,600
Administration and Accounting
Fund 1,600 1,600
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 5,800 0 5,800
TOTAL $86,600 $1,004,800 $1,091,400
B. AUDIT DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $70,300 $68,800 $139,100
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 19,100 19,100
Administration and Accounting
Fund 800 800
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 15,700 0 15,700
TOTAL $105,900 $68,800 $174,700
C. COMPLIANCE DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $92,400 $130,200 $222,600
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 2,200 0 2,200
TOTAL $94,600 $130,200 $224,800
D. REVENUE OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $270,800 $61,300 $332,100
Administration and Accounting
Fund 1,200 1,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 11,500 0 11,500
TOTAL $283,500 $61,300 $344,800
E. PROPERTY TAX:
FROM:
General
Fund $21,200 $35,000 $56,200
(30) SECRETARY OF STATE:
I. SECRETARY OF STATE:
FROM:
General
Fund $11,000 $850,000 $861,000
II. COMMISSION ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,900 $1,900
(31) STATE TREASURER:
FROM:
General
Fund $41,800 $26,700 $68,500
GRANDTOTAL $48,608,700 $20,539,000 $1,919,700 $121,588,700 $192,656,100
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026. Notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, the full-time equivalent position
authorization provided to each of the programs listed below are hereby re-
duced by the following amounts for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026, unless specifically authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Ap-
propriations Committee will be notified promptly of any increased positions
so authorized.
Family Medical Residencies .....................................0.50
WWAMI Medical Education ........................................1.19
Idaho Geological Survey ........................................1.00
Division of Vocational Rehabilitation ..........................2.63
Youth Safety and Permanency ...................................12.00


Early Learning and Development .................................6.00
Division of Medicaid ...........................................2.00
Public Health Services .........................................0.32
Children's Mental Health ......................................12.13
Adult Mental Health ............................................5.71
Domestic Violence Council ......................................1.00
Department of Correction ......................................11.50
Idaho State Police .............................................4.00
Department of Environmental Quality ............................7.00
Department of Lands ............................................0.67
Department of Water Resources ..................................3.00
Department of Agriculture - Animal Industries ...................1.00
Soil and Water Conservation Commission ..........................1.00
Department of Commerce .........................................7.00
Industrial Commission .........................................1.25
Public Utilities Commission ....................................1.00
Idaho State Historical Society .................................1.00
Idaho Commission for Libraries .................................1.75
Division of Veterans Services ..................................2.40
Commission on the Arts .........................................2.00
Executive Office of the Governor ................................4.00
State Liquor Division ..........................................4.00
Military Division .............................................3.00
STEM Action Center .............................................1.00
SECTION 3. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE PUBLIC SCHOOL INCOME FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $22,366,500 from the Public School Income Fund to the
General Fund as soon thereafter as practicable for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.